Utah statutes.
53A-2-104.   Transfer of a portion of a school district -- Board resolution -- Board petition -- Elector petition -- Transfer election.

(1)  Part of a school district may be transferred to another district in one of the following ways:

(a)  presentation to the county legislative body of each of the affected counties of a resolution requesting the transfer, approved by at least four-fifths of the members of the local board of education of each affected school district; 

(b)  presentation to the county legislative body of each affected county of a petition requesting that the electors vote on the transfer, signed by a majority of the members of the local school board of each affected school district; or

(c)  presentation to the county legislative body of each affected county of a petition requesting that the electors vote on the transfer, signed by 15% of the qualified electors in each of the affected school districts within that county.

(2) (a)  If an annexation of property by a city would result in its residents being served by more than one school district, then the presidents of the affected local school boards shall meet within 60 days prior to the effective date of the annexation to determine whether it would be advisable to adjust school district boundaries to permit all residents of the expanded city to be served by a single school district.

(b)  Upon conclusion of the meeting, the local school board presidents shall prepare a recommendation for presentation to their respective boards as soon as reasonably possible.

(c)  The boards may then initiate realignment proceedings under Subsection (1)(a) or (b).

(d)  If a local board rejects realignment under Subsection (1)(a) or (b), the other board may initiate the following procedures by majority vote within 60 days of the vote rejecting realignment:

(i) (A)  within 30 days after a vote to initiate these procedures, each local board shall appoint one member to a boundary review committee; or

(B)  if the local board becomes deadlocked in selecting the appointee under Subsection (2)(d)(i)(A), the board's chair shall make the appointment or serve as the appointee to the review committee.

(ii)  The two local board-appointed members of the committee shall meet and appoint a third member of the committee.

(iii)  If the two local board-appointed members are unable to agree on the appointment of a third member within 30 days after both are appointed, the State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint the third member.

(iv)  The committee shall meet as necessary to prepare recommendations concerning resolution of the realignment issue, and shall submit the recommendations to the affected local boards within six months after the appointment of the third member of the committee.

(v)  If a majority of the members of each local board accepts the recommendation of the committee, or accepts the recommendation after amendment by the boards, then the accepted recommendation shall be implemented.

(vi)  If the committee fails to submit its recommendation within the time allotted, or if one local board rejects the recommendation, the affected boards may agree to extend the time for the committee to prepare an acceptable recommendation or either board may request the State Board of Education to resolve the question.

(vii)  If the committee has submitted a recommendation which the state board finds to be reasonably supported by the evidence, the state board shall adopt the committee's recommendation.

(viii)  The decision of the state board is final.

(3) (a)  The electors of each affected district shall vote on the transfer requested under Subsection (1)(b) or (c) at an election called for that purpose, which may be the next general election.

(b)  The election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed as provided by election law.

(c)  A transfer is effected only if a majority of votes cast by the electors in both the proposed transferor district and in the proposed transferee district are in favor of the transfer.



Amended by Chapter 215, 2007 General Session

